Hawaii statutes.
§651-41 Priority in levying. Every
officer receiving a writ of execution issued in due form by any court or judge,
shall note thereon the day and hour of its receipt, and the officer shall give
priority in levying upon property of the defendant in execution, to the writs
received by the officer according to the order of time in which they are
received. [CC 1859, §1021; RL 1925, §2445; RL 1935, §4144; RL 1945, §10171; RL
1955, §233-40; HRS §651-41; gen ch 1985]

Case Notes

Levy makes judgment a lien. 4 H. 165 (1879).

A subsequently served garnishee process had priority over
defective execution levied by marshal first. 6 H. 153 (1875).

Execution must be postponed to lien of prior attachment. 6
H. 564 (1885).

Cited: 3 U.S.D.C. Haw. 176, 179 (1907).

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next